Utah statutes.
48-2a-904.   Name.

A foreign limited partnership shall register with the division under the name under which it is registered in its state of organization; provided that the name includes the words "limited partnership", "limited", "L.P.", or "Ltd." and provided that the name could be registered by a domestic limited partnership.



Enacted by Chapter 233, 1990 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

